Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-541.01
Immunization information system;
established; purpose; access to records authorized.

The Department of Health and Human Services
shall establish an immunization information system for the purpose of providing
a central data base of immunization information which can be accessed pursuant
to rules and regulations of the department by any person or entity listed
in section 71-539, by a patient, and by a patient's parent or legal guardian
if the patient is a minor or under guardianship. In order to facilitate operation
of the immunization information system, the department shall provide the system
with access to all records of the department, including, but not limited to,
vital records.

Laws 2011, LB591, § 7.